Indiana, session 2026, HB1326.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 2-5-57.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 57.5. Indiana Emergency Efficiency and Resilience
Task Force
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "task force" refers to the Indiana
emergency efficiency and resilience task force established by
section 2 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. The Indiana emergency efficiency and resilience task
force is established.
Sec. 3. (a) The task force consists of the following members:
(1) Five (5) members of the senate, appointed as follows:
(A) Three (3) members appointed by the president pro
tempore, one (1) of whom serves as co-chair of the task
force.
(B) Two (2) members appointed by the minority leader.
(2) Five (5) members of the house of representatives,
2026 IN 1326—LS 6912/DI 153


appointed as follows:
(A) Three (3) members appointed by the speaker, one (1)
of whom serves as co-chair of the task force.
(B) Two (2) members appointed by the minority leader.
(3) The following nonvoting members:
(A) The director of the department of natural resources.
(B) The commissioner of the department of environmental
management.
(C) A representative from the office of emergency
management established within the department of
homeland security, appointed by the governor.
(D) A representative from the Indiana department of
transportation, appointed by the governor.
(E) A representative from the Indiana state department of
agriculture, appointed by the governor.
The members described in subdivisions (1) and (2) are voting
members.
(b) A member of the task force serves for the duration of the
task force.
(c) A vacancy on the task force shall be filled by the appointing
authority.
Sec. 4. (a) The task force shall meet at the call of the co-chairs.
(b) The affirmative votes of a majority of the voting members
of the task force are required for the task force to take action on
any measure.
(c) A quorum of the task force consists of six (6) members.
(d) All meetings of the task force are open to the public in
accordance with and subject to IC 5-14-1.5. All records of the task
force are subject to the requirements of IC 5-14-3.
Sec. 5. (a) Each member of the task force who is a member of
the general assembly is entitled to receive per diem, mileage, and
travel allowances. Per diem, mileage, and travel allowances paid
under this subsection shall be paid from appropriations made to
the legislative council or the legislative services agency.
(b) Each member of the task force who is not a member of the
general assembly is not entitled to reimbursement for traveling
expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4 or other expenses actually
incurred in connection with the member's duties as provided in the
state policies and procedures established by the Indiana
department of administration and approved by the budget agency.
(c) The expenses of the task force shall be paid from amounts
appropriated to the legislative council or the legislative services
2026 IN 1326—LS 6912/DI 153


agency.
Sec. 6. The legislative services agency shall provide staff support
to the task force.
Sec. 7. (a) The task force shall do the following:
(1) Conduct a gap analysis of resilience efforts in Indiana,
including:
(A) a review of past and current initiatives to increase
disaster resilience; and
(B) an assessment of data gaps with respect to current and
future disaster risks, including data describing
precipitation patterns, stream flows, and riverine and flash
flood risk.
(2) Study the benefit of establishing an office or officer
responsible for leading and coordinating resilience efforts in
Indiana, including:
(A) a review of how other states have implemented or
established:
(i) state resilience offices;
(ii) chief resilience officers; and
(iii) state resilience plans; and
(B) an assessment of whether the models described in
clause (A) may be replicable in Indiana.
(3) Assess water management roles within the department of
natural resources and department of environmental
management to:
(A) align responsibilities;
(B) consolidate processes where appropriate; and
(C) improve statewide operational efficiency.
(b) In discharging duties under this section, the task force may
hear testimony from professionals, academics, and others with
relevant expertise.
Sec. 8. Not later than December 1, 2026, the task force shall
submit a written report to the legislative council in an electronic
format under IC 5-14-6. The report must state specific findings and
recommendations regarding the following:
(1) What duties are necessary for leading and coordinating
resilience efforts in Indiana.
(2) Whether a state resilience officer, or equivalent position,
should be established to lead and coordinate resilience efforts
in Indiana, and where this position should be located within
state government.
(3) Whether the duties necessary to lead and coordinate
2026 IN 1326—LS 6912/DI 153


resilience efforts in Indiana should be assigned to an existing
state agency.
(4) Whether a statewide plan for long term disaster resilience
and risk reduction should be created.
(5) How a statewide plan for long term disaster resilience and
risk reduction should be created or incorporated into existing
planning processes.
(6) What elements a statewide plan for long term disaster
resilience and risk reduction should contain.
(7) How best to consolidate water responsibilities within state
agencies to increase efficiencies.
The report may propose legislation or recommend specific
executive action.
Sec. 9. This chapter expires December 31, 2026.
2026 IN 1326—LS 6912/DI 153